Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,148
Highway Allocation Fund; distribution of funds.

(1) The State Treasurer shall monthly distribute the receipts accruing to the Highway Allocation Fund pursuant to section 66-4,147. One-half of such receipts shall be distributed to the various counties and municipal counties for road purposes and one-half of such receipts shall be distributed to the various municipalities and municipal counties for street purposes.

(2) The distribution of funds to the respective cities, counties, and municipal counties under subsection (1) of this section shall be based on the provisions of Chapter 39, article 25.

Laws 1980, LB 722, § 18;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-480;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 53.